Illinois, session 104th, HB1709.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the Local 5Accessory Dwelling Unit Act. 6    Section 5. Definitions. As used in this Act:7    "Accessory dwelling unit" means an attached or detached 8residential dwelling unit that provides complete independent 9living facilities for one or more persons, is located on a lot 10with a proposed or existing primary residence, and includes 11permanent provisions for living, sleeping, eating, cooking, 12and sanitation on the same parcel as the single-family or 13multifamily dwelling it is or will be situated. "Accessory 14dwelling unit" includes, but is not limited to:15        (1) An efficiency unit.16        (2) A manufactured home, as that term is defined in 17    paragraph (53) of subsection (a) of Section 9-102 of the 18    Uniform Commercial Code.19    "Efficiency unit" means a unit for occupancy by no more 20than 2 persons which has a minimum floor area of 150 square 21feet and may also have a partial kitchen or bathroom 22facilities.   HB1709- 2 -LRB104 08748 RTM 18802 b1    Section 10. Regulation of accessory dwelling units. 2    (a) A unit of local government may not prohibit the 3building or usage of accessory dwelling units in the unit of 4local government.5    (b) A unit of local government may provide reasonable 6regulations relating to the size and location of accessory 7dwelling units similar to other accessory structures unless a 8regulation would have the effect of prohibiting accessory 9dwelling units. 10    Section 15. Home rule. A home rule unit may not regulate 11accessory dwelling units in a manner inconsistent with this 12Act. This Act is a limitation under subsection (i) of Section 6 13of Article VII of the Illinois Constitution on the concurrent 14exercise by home rule units of powers and functions exercised 15by the State. 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.